District of Columbia statutes.
42-2601

Establishment; purpose; unexpended balance.

There is hereby established in the District of Columbia and there is authorized, and accounted for in the General Fund as a separate revenue source allocable to provide financial assistance to low and moderate income persons, and District of Columbia Government employees participating in the District of Columbia Employer-Assisted Housing Program, and families seeking to purchase homes in the District of Columbia, for the purposes of enabling them to purchase decent, safe, and sanitary homes in the District of Columbia. Any unexpended balance at the end of the year shall be reserved as a restricted fund balance and used to provide authorization to expend for subsequent years subject to the direction of the Mayor.

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-103, § 2, 25 DCR 1977
June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 7(1), 27 DCR 1776
Oct. 24, 1981, D.C. Law 4-44, § 2(b), 28 DCR 4265
Sept. 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-151, § 2(a), 33 DCR 4783
June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-118, § 8(a), 39 DCR 3189
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1101, 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-259, § 2(a), 46 DCR 1316
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-96, § 9(a), 47 DCR 1081

History

1981 Ed., § 45-2201.
1973 Ed., § 45-1801.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-96 inserted “the District of Columbia Government employees participating in the District of Columbia Employer-Assisted Housing Program” following “low and moderate income persons.”
Section 11 of D.C. Law 13-96 provided: “This act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 9(a) of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-188, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10407).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 9(a) of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-258, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1124).

Emergency Legislation

Repeal of Law 9-118

Section 1101 of D.C. Law 12-60 repealed the District of Columbia Employer-Assisted Housing Act of 1992, D.C. Law 9-118.

Repeal of Law